Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.265

Distribution of assets.

The assets of a corporation in the process of dissolution shall be applied and distributed as follows:

(1) All liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid, satisfied and discharged, or adequate provision made therefor;

(2) Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with such requirements;

(3) Remaining assets, if any shall be distributed to the members, shareholders or others in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 53.]